Washington statutes.
RCW 16.38.030

Employment of personnel.

In carrying out such diagnostic service program the director of agriculture may employ, subject to the state civil service act, chapter 41.06 RCW, the necessary personnel to properly effectuate such diagnostic service program.

[ 1969 c 100 s 3.]